src/pronoun-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON nubbiPxPl
 +PxPl1:eamet K ;
 +PxPl2:eattet K ;
 +PxPl3:easet K ;
 
LEXICON nubbiPxDuCom
 +PxDu1:eameguin K ;
 +PxDu2:eatteguin K ;
 +PxDu3:easkkaguin K ;

LEXICON nubbiPxPlCom
 +PxPl1:eametguin K ;
 +PxPl2:eattetguin K ;
 +PxPl3:easetguin K ;


! Indefinite pronouns
! -------------------

! Dividing the indefinites in three groups
LEXICON Indefinite
 declindef-cl ;
 declindef ;
 declindef-idiosync ;
 indeclindef ;
 +Use/Sub: indefmulti ; ! feara mii

! Declineable indefinite pronouns with case + clitic
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON declindef-cl

! Exceptional nominatives
mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:mihkke%>ge # ;
mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom:mahkke%>ge # ;
mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen:maide%>ge # ;
mihkke+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:mihkke%> # ;
 mihkket+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:mihkke%>t # ; !
mihkkige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:mihkki%>ge # ;
mihkkige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom:mahkki%>ge # ;
mihkkige+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen:maidi%>ge # ;
giige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:gii%>ge # ;
giinai+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:gii%>nai # ;
giijai+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:gii%>jai # ;
giiat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:gii%>at # ;
dahtai+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:daht%>ai # ;
miinai+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:mii%>nai # ;
miijai+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:mii%>jai # ;
ieš#giige+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:ieš#gii%>ge # ;
ieš#giinai+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:ieš#gii%>nai # ;
ieš#giijai+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:ieš#gii%>jai # ;

! Pointers to obl sublexicon
mihkkege+Pron+Indef:ma%> oblindefcas ;
giige+Pron+Indef:gea%> oblindefcas ;
giinai+Pron+Indef:gea%> oblindefcas-giinai ;
miinai+Pron+Indef:ma%> oblindefcas-miinai ;
ieš#giige+Pron+Indef:ieš#gea%> oblindefcas ;
ieš#giinai+Pron+Indef:ieš#gea%> oblindefcas-giinai ;
guhtege+Pron+Indef:guh'te GUHTEGECASE ;
guhtenai+Pron+Indef:guh'te GUHTENAI ;
!ieš#guh0te+Pron+Indef:ieš#guh'te GUHTECASE ;
ieš#guhtege+Pron+Indef:ieš#guh'te GUHTEGECASE ;
ieš#guhtenai+Pron+Indef:ieš#guh'te GUHTENAI ;
guhtemušge+Pron+Indef:guđemužž GUHTEMUSGECASE ;
 guhtemušge+Pron+Indef:guhtemuš%>ge # ; !deviating Nom altarnant.
goabbáge+Pron+Indef:goabbá GUHTEGECASE ;
goabbánai+Pron+Indef:goabbá GUHTENAI ;
!makkárge+Pron+Indef (have a look at this one)
!oktage+Pron+Indef (wait with this one until numerals are treated)

!The difference between mihkkege and mihkkige
!continues through declination (maidege-maidige etc.).
!Should they be separated in different lexicons to make it logical? IK

LEXICON oblindefcas
 +Sg:0 oblindemcassg ;
 +Pl:0 oblindemcaspl ;


LEXICON oblindemcassg
!The other cases, then pointing to clitics
 +Gen:nge # ;
 +Gen:nge»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:nge # ;
 +Ill:sage # ;
 +Loc:sge # ;
 +Loc:stege # ;
 +Com:jnnage # ;

LEXICON oblindemcaspl
 +Gen:jde # ;
 +Gen:jde»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:jde # ;
 +Gen:jdege # ;
 +Gen:jdege»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:jdege # ;
 +Gen:jdige # ;
 +Gen:jdige»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:jdige # ;
 +Ill:jddage # ;
 +Loc:jnge # ;
!Here we do not go to the case paradigm of the demonstratives,
!since the clitic path is different. ComPl lacks (intentionally) from paradigm.

LEXICON oblindefcas-giinai
 +Gen:nnai # ;
 +Gen:nnai»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:nnai # ;
 +Gen:nai # ;
 +Gen:nai»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:nai # ;
 +Ill:sanai # ;
 +Ill:sai # ;
 +Loc:snai # ;
 +Loc:sai # ;
 +Loc:stenai # ;
 +Loc:stai # ;
 +Com:jnnanai # ;
 +Com:jnnai # ;
 +Gen:jdnai # ;
 +Gen:jdnai»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:jdnai # ;
 +Gen:jdai # ;
 +Gen:jdai»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:jdai # ;
 +Ill:jddanai # ;
 +Ill:jddai # ;
 +Loc:jnnai # ;
 +Loc:jnai # ;
 
LEXICON oblindefcas-miinai
 +Gen:nnai # ;
 +Gen:nnai»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:nnai # ;
! +Gen:nai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Gen:nai»# NAMAT ;
! +Acc:nai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Ill:sanai # ;
 +Ill:sai # ;
 +Loc:snai # ;
 +Loc:sai # ;
 +Loc:stenai # ;
 +Loc:stai # ;
 +Com:jnnanai # ;
 +Com:jnnai # ;
 +Gen:jdnai # ;
 +Gen:jdnai»# NAMAT ;
 +Acc:jdnai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
! +Gen:jdai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Gen:jdai»# NAMAT ;
! +Acc:jdai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Ill:jddanai # ;
! +Ill:jddai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
 +Loc:jnnai # ;
 +Loc:jnai # ;




! guhtege
LEXICON GUHTEGECASE
 GUHTEGE-NE ;
 GUGE-GUGE-OBL ;


! Nom and Ess of guhtege
LEXICON GUHTEGE-NE
 +Sg+Nom:%>ge # ;
 +Ess:%>nge # ;

! guhtemušge
LEXICON GUHTEMUSGECASE
 GUHTEMUSGE-NE ;
 :a%> GUGE-GUGE-OBL ;

! Nom and Ess of guhtemušge
LEXICON GUHTEMUSGE-NE
 +Sg+Nom:%>ge # ;
 +Ess:a%>nge # ;

! Oblique paradigm for guhtege and guhtemušGE
LEXICON GUGE-GUGE-OBL
 +Sg+Gen:X8ge # ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8ge»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8ge # ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3jge # ;
!+Sg+Gen:ge # ; ! this should go out
 +Sg+Loc:X4sge # ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4nge K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X5jnge # ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4tge # ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jdge # ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jdge»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jdge # ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jdege # ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:X5jnge # ; ! because of speller
!+Pl+Com:X5jgujnge # ; !ComPl is out.

LEXICON GUHTENAI
 +Sg+Nom:%>nai # ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X8nai # ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X8nai»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X8nai # ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X3jnai # ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4snai # ;
 +Sg+Com:%>X5jnnai # ;
 +Ess:%>nnai # ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4tnai # ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X5jdnai # ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X5jdnai»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X5jdnai # ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X5jdenai # ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X5jnnai # ; ! because of speller



! Declineable indefinites with normal case paradigms
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

!splitting v- and c-final evensyll in two for NomEss, as usual.
LEXICON indef-a-even-v
 indefattr ;
 indefdecleven-v-ne ;
 indefdecleven-obl ;

LEXICON indef-a-even-c
 :%> indefattr ;
 :%> indefdecleven-c-ne ;
 :a%> indefdecleven-obl ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-obl
 indefdeclsgeven ;
 indefdeclpleven ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-v-ne
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:n K ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-c-ne
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:an K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsgeven
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X5jn K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpleven
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd9»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;
 
LEXICON nubbicase
 +Attr:0 K ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4X7 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4X7»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4X7 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd9»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;


LEXICON JUOBBAGOABBA
 +Sg+Nom:juobbá%>#goabbá%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:juoppá%>#goappá%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:juoppá%>#goappá»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Acc:juoppá%>#goappá%> K ;
 +Sg+Ill:juobbá%>i#goabbá%>i K ;
 +Sg+Loc:juoppá%>s#goappá%>s K ;
 +Sg+Com:juoppá%>in#goappá%>in K ;
 +Ess:juobbá%>n#goabbá%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:juobbá%>t#goabbá%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:juobbá%>jde#goabbá%>jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:juoppá%>jn#goappá%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:juoppá%>jgujn#goappá%>jgujn K ;

! Intermediate lexica for uneven indefinite pronouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indef-a-uneven
 indefattr ;
 indefdecluneven ;

LEXICON indef-a-uneven-gahpir
 indefattr ;
 indefdecluneven-gahpir ;

LEXICON indefsg-a-uneven
 indefattr ;
 indu-sg ;

LEXICON indefdecluneven
 indu-sg ;
 indu-pl-gahpir ;

LEXICON indu-sg
 :X4 indef-sg-u-n ;
 indef-sg-u-e ;
 :X2 indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
 indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;

LEXICON indefdecluneven-gahpir
 indu-sg-gahpir ;
 indu-pl-gahpir ;

LEXICON indu-sg-gahpir
 indefdeclsguneven-ne ;
 indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
 indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;

LEXICON indu-pl-gahpir
 indefdeclpluneven-n ;
 :i indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
 indef-sg-u-e ; !For eatnagin

! Suffix lexica for uneven indefinite pronouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ne
 indef-sg-u-n ;
 indef-sg-u-e ;

LEXICON indef-sg-u-n
 +Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON indef-sg-u-e
 +Ess:in K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ag
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ilc
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;

LEXICON declindef
eará+Pron+Indef:eará%>               indef-a-even-v ;
iežá+Pron+Indef:iežá%>                   indef-a-even-v ;
uhccánaš+Pron+Indef:uhccánažž       indef-a-even-c ;
unnánaš+Pron+Indef:unnánažž           indef-a-even-c ;
ea0nas+Pron+Indef:eatnas%>           indef-a-uneven ;
ea0naš+Pron+Indef:eatnaš%>               indef-a-uneven ;
muhtin+Pron+Indef:muhtim%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
muhtun+Pron+Indef:muhtum%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
 muhtun+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:muhtom%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ; !
uhccán+Pron+Indef:uhccán%>       indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
unnán+Pron+Indef:unnán%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
veháš+Pron+Indef:veháž%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
váháš+Pron+Indef:váháž%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
veaháš+Pron+Indef:veaháž%>           indef-a-uneven-gahpir ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>X2      indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>          indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;
nuppát+Pron+Indef:nuppád%>              indefsg-a-uneven ;
duobbá+Pron+Indef:duobbá%>              indef-a-even-v ;
dábbá+Pron+Indef:dábbá%>              indef-a-even-v ;
juobbá+Pron+Indef:juobbá%>              indef-a-even-v ;
juobbá#goabbá+Pron+Indef: JUOBBAGOABBA ;
nubbi+Pron+Indef:nubbi%>             nubbicase ;
nubbi+Pron+Recipr:nubbi%>             nubbicase ;
juohkehaš+Pron+Indef:juohkehažž         indef-a-even-c ;
ollut+Pron+Indef:ollu%>           indefdeclpleven ;
olut+Pron+Indef:olu%>           indefdeclpleven ;
moanat+Pron+Indef:moana%>           indefdeclpleven ;
buohkat+Pron+Indef:buohka%>       indefdeclpleven ;
gait#divnnat+Pron+Indef:gait#divnna%> indefdeclpleven ;
gait#diinnat+Pron+Indef:gait#dijnna%> indefdeclpleven ;
gait#tiinnat+Pron+Indef:gait#tijnna%> indefdeclpleven ;
gaikkat+Pron+Indef:gajkka%>       indefdeclpleven ;
goappašagat+Pron+Indef:goappašaga%>  indefdeclpleven ;
ollugat+Pron+Indef:ollug%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
oallugat+Pron+Indef:oallug%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
olugat+Pron+Indef:olug%>           indu-pl-gahpir ;
gal0lis+Pron+Indef:gal'lis%>       indefdecluneven ;
olus+Pron+Indef:olus%>           indefdecluneven ;
 ol0lus+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:ol'lus%>           indefdecluneven ; ! substandard
soamis+Pron+Indef:soamis%>       indefdecluneven ;
eambbosat+Pron+Indef:eambbos%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
eambbogat+Pron+Indef:eambbog%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
guoktásat+Pron+Indef:guoktás%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
goappašat+Pron+Indef:goappaš%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
goappešat+Pron+Indef:goappeš%>        indu-pl-gahpir ;
eatnagat+Pron+Indef:eatnag%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
galládat+Pron+Indef:gallád%>       indu-pl-gahpir ;
